Washington statutes.
RCW 18.390.080

Violations—Application of consumer protection act—Notice of complaints—Attorney general enforcement.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 5691-S.SL) ***

(1) The legislature finds that the violation of the title protection requirements of RCW 18.390.050, the failure of a continuing care retirement community to register with the department under RCW 18.390.020, the failure of a continuing care retirement community to comply with the disclosure statement delivery and content requirements under RCW 18.390.060, and the failure of a continuing care retirement community to comply with the resident expectations established under RCW 18.390.070 are matters vitally affecting the public interest for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW. A violation of the title protection requirements under RCW 18.390.050, registration requirement under RCW 18.390.020, the disclosure statement delivery and content requirements under RCW 18.390.060, and the resident expectations requirements under RCW 18.390.070 are not reasonable in relation to the development and preservation of business and are an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition for the purpose of applying the consumer protection act, chapter 19.86 RCW.

(2) The attorney general shall provide notice to the management of the continuing care retirement community of submitted complaints including the name of the complainant to allow the community to take corrective action. Except for violations of the title protection requirements of RCW 18.390.050 and the failure of a continuing care retirement community to register with the department under RCW 18.390.020, the attorney general shall limit its application of the consumer protection act in subsection (1) of this section to those cases in which a pattern of complaints, submitted by affected parties, or other activity that, when considered together, demonstrate a pattern of similar conduct that, without enforcement, likely establishes an unfair or deceptive act in trade or commerce and an unfair method of competition.

[ 2016 c 183 s 8.]